Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-436
Infraction, penalties.

Any person guilty of an infraction when a penalty is not otherwise specified shall: (1) For the first offense be fined not more than one hundred dollars; (2) upon a second conviction for the same infraction within a two-year period be fined not less than one hundred dollars and not more than three hundred dollars; and (3) upon a third or subsequent conviction for the same infraction within a two-year period be fined not less than two hundred dollars and not more than five hundred dollars.

Laws 1979, LB 534, § 3.